Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-620
Society names and emblems; similarity; registration not granted, when.

No registration shall be granted or alteration permitted to any association, lodge, order, fraternal society, beneficial association, or fraternal and beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, foundation, federation, or any other society, organization or association, degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof, having a name, badge, motto, button, decoration, charm, emblem, rosette, or other insignia, similar to, imitating, or so nearly resembling as to be calculated to deceive, any other name, badge, button, decoration, charm, emblem, rosette, or other insignia whatsoever, already registered pursuant to the provisions of sections 21-617 to 21-619.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 4, p. 497;

C.S.1929, § 24-617;

R.S.1943, § 21-620.